Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.220

Modification, suspension, termination of preliminary orders.

The arbitral tribunal may modify, suspend, or terminate an interim measure or a preliminary order it has granted upon application of any party or, in exceptional circumstances and upon prior notice to the parties, on the arbitral tribunal's own initiative.

[ 2015 c 276 s 22.]